Massachusetts, session 194th, H1697.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 131S of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following:-
(l) Upon issuance of an extreme risk protection order, the court shall order the respondent
to undergo a psychiatric evaluation. The psychiatric evaluation must be conducted by a licensed
mental health professional, approved by the department of public health, and must occur within
ten days of the issuance of the extreme risk protection order.
The psychiatric evaluation shall assess the following:
(1) The mental health status of the respondent, including any diagnosed mental illness or
conditions that may pose a risk to the respondent or others.
(2) The respondent's history of violence, threats, or self-harm, if any.
of 2

(3) The respondent’s ability to safely handle firearms or other weapons in light of the
psychiatric evaluation.
Upon completion of the psychiatric evaluation, the results shall be submitted to the court.
The court shall review the evaluation findings in conjunction with any other evidence before
making a decision regarding the continuation, modification, or dissolution of the extreme risk
protection order.
SECTION 2. The department of public health, in collaboration with the Massachusetts
Trial Court, shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
of 2